Alaska, session 34, SB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 17.20.332(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) The sale of a homemade food under this section 05 (1) is only for personal consumption; 06 (2) must occur in the state at a farmers' market, an agricultural fair, a 07 farm, a ranch, the producer's home or office, the retail location of a third-party seller, 08 or a location agreed on between the producer and the buyer; and 09 (3) may not involve 10 (A) interstate commerce; or 11 (B) the purchase or sale of 12 (i) meat or meat products, except as provided in (h) of 13 this section; 14 (ii) seafood; 15 (iii) a controlled substance; 01 (iv) oil rendered from animal fat; [OR] 02 (v) game meat; or 03 (vi) potentially hazardous homemade food in 04 reduced oxygen packaging. 05 * Sec. 2. AS 17.20.338 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 06 (13) "reduced oxygen packaging" means packaging for a homemade 07 food product from which oxygen has been removed to maintain product quality or to 08 promote a vacuum seal. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.